North Carolina, session 2025, SB980.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Chapter 145 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
section to read:
"§ 145-52. Official hip-hop song.
The censored version of the song "Raise Up" by North Carolina rapper Petey Pablo is adopted
as the official hip-hop song of the State of North Carolina."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Natural and Cultural Resources the sum of six million five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000)
in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year and the 2027-2028 fiscal year to be used for
the North Carolina Music Heritage and Tourism Initiative (Initiative). The Initiative shall use
funds for (i) a statewide promotion campaign entitled "First in Flight, First in Sound," including
traditional and digital advertisement, documentaries, and branded content, (ii) planning and
holding of hip-hop related festival and concert events, (iii) partnering with local governments
and HBCUs for promotion of the Initiative and campaign, (iv) creating a hip-hop music heritage
trail, and (v) creating an interactive application for mobile devices that can be used by attendees,
participants, HBCUs, and local businesses for Initiative and campaign information and
promotion. The Initiative shall take steps to ensure the cultural and hip-hop music scenes
throughout the State are represented, including, at a minimum, Greenville, Fayetteville, Durham,
Charlotte, and Raleigh. The Initiative shall have two honorary chairpersons that represent North
Carolina hip-hop music and hip-hop music heritage.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*S980-v-1*